Kentucky statutes. TITLE XIV Libraries And Archives
Public Library Districts

173.450.
Definitions for KRS 173.450 to 173.650.

“District” means “public library district”; and

“Board” means the board of trustees of a public library district.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 114, § 1; 1972, ch. 223, § 7.

173.460.
Public library district — Taxation — Purpose.

All of the territory in a county, or in two (2) or more counties contiguous to each other may be organized into a public library district for the purpose of levying a tax to pay for establishing, equipping, maintaining and administering libraries, or for contracting for library service from any existing library.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 114, § 2, effective June 16, 1960.

173.470.
Organization — Special tax.

Districts shall be organized in accordance with the procedures of KRS

65.182

.

A public library district created pursuant to KRS

65.182

and this section shall constitute and be a taxing district within the meaning of Section 157 of the Constitution of Kentucky. In no event shall the maximum special ad valorem tax imposed for the maintenance and operation of the district exceed twenty cents ($0.20) on each one hundred dollars ($100) of the assessed valuation of all property in the district.

All special ad valorem taxes authorized by KRS

173.450

to

173.650

shall be collected in the same manner as are other county ad valorem taxes in each county affected and shall be turned over to the board as the governing body of the district. The special ad valorem tax shall be in addition to all other ad valorem taxes.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 114, § 3; 1962, ch. 71; 1964, ch. 55, § 4; 1978, ch. 384, § 296, effective June 17, 1978; 1982, ch. 360, § 52, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 100, § 12, effective July 13, 1984.

173.480.
Notice of organization — Copy of petition — Duties of Department for Libraries and Archives — Board membership. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

Upon the creation of a district, the fiscal court of each county in the district shall at once notify the Department for Libraries and Archives of the establishment of the district and shall forward to the department a copy of the petition required pursuant to KRS

173.470

. The Department for Libraries and Archives shall then recommend to the county judge/executive of each county in the district the names of suitable persons from among the signers of the petition to be appointed to the board. The Department for Libraries and Archives in recommending persons to the county judge/executive for appointment to the board shall recommend twice as many persons for each county as the county is entitled to have members appointed, and the county judge/executive shall immediately, with the approval of the fiscal court, make the selection from those recommended. Where the district consists of one (1) county, the county judge/executive shall appoint five (5) persons from that county as members. The Department for Libraries and Archives shall prescribe by regulation the number of board members when the district consists of more than one (1) county, provided that the board shall consist of not less than one (1) nor more than four (4) members from each county, each county having such number of members as the proportion of its population bears to the total population in the district, and that the total membership of the board consists of not less than five (5) members. Where a county joins an already established district, the Department for Libraries and Archives shall, from among the signers of the petition, recommend to the county judge/executive of each county included in the new district for the first time twice as many persons for appointment to the board as the county is entitled to have appointed, and the county judge/executive shall select the members for the county from this list. The terms of the members of the counties composing the previously existing district shall expire immediately upon the organization of the new board and such vacancies shall be filled as provided in KRS

173.490

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 114, § 4, effective June 16, 1960; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 20, § 6, effective January 2, 1978; 1980, ch. 18, § 15, effective July 15, 1980; 1980, ch. 188, § 130, effective July 15, 1980; 1984, ch. 218, § 1, effective July 13, 1984; 1990, ch. 58, § 3, effective July 13, 1990.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Board members under this section are to be classified as municipal officers.

OAG 75-696

.

There is no statute authorizing the fiscal court or the county judge to remove a library trustee under any circumstances.

OAG 76-757

.

An elected county official, except a commissioner of the fiscal court of a county containing a first-class city, may serve on the board of a library formed under KRS

173.450

to

173.650

or

173.710

to

173.800

.

OAG 78-331

.

173.480.
Notice of organization — Copy of petition — Duties of Department for Libraries and Archives — Board membership — Appointment process. [Effective January 1, 2023]

Upon the creation of a district, the fiscal court of each county in the district shall at once notify the Department for Libraries and Archives of the establishment of the district and shall forward to the department a copy of the petition required pursuant to KRS

173.470

. The Department for Libraries and Archives shall then recommend to the county judge/executive of each county in the district the names of suitable persons from among the signers of the petition to be appointed to the board. The Department for Libraries and Archives in recommending persons to the county judge/executive for appointment to the board shall recommend twice as many persons for each county as the county is entitled to have members appointed, and the county judge/executive shall immediately, with the approval of the fiscal court, make the selection from those recommended unless the fiscal court has adopted an alternative appointment process through the passage of a resolution. For fiscal courts that adopt an alternative appointment process, the county judge/executive:

May immediately, with the approval of the fiscal court, make the selection from those recommended by the Department for Libraries and Archives; and

For any appointments the county judge/executive decides not to fill from the first recommendations, shall request the Department for Libraries and Archives to submit within thirty (30) days two (2) additional recommended persons for each unfilled appointment, and, with the approval of the fiscal court, may make the selection from those recommendations; and

For any remaining unfilled appointments after the provisions of paragraph (a) of this subsection have been followed, shall appoint, with the approval of the fiscal court, individuals of his or her choosing, whether or not the individuals signed the petition, no later than thirty (30) days after the day the county judge/executive received the recommendations under paragraph (a)2. of this subsection and made no appointment therefrom. The county judge/executive shall notify the Department for Libraries and Archives of the name of any individual appointed in the manner set out in this paragraph.

Where the district consists of one (1) county, the county judge/executive shall appoint five (5) persons from that county as members.

Where the district consists of more than one (1) county, the Department for Libraries and Archives shall prescribe by regulation the number of board members, provided that the board shall consist of:

Not less than one (1) nor more than four (4) members from each county, each county having such number of members as the proportion of its population bears to the total population in the district; and

Not less than five (5) members.

Where a county joins an already established district:

The Department for Libraries and Archives shall, from among the signers of the petition, recommend to the county judge/executive of each county included in the new district for the first time twice as many persons for appointment to the board as the county is entitled to have appointed, and the county judge/executive shall select the members for the county from this list unless the fiscal court has adopted an alternative appointment process through the passage of a resolution. For fiscal courts that adopt an alternative appointment process, the county judge/executive:

May select the members for the county from those recommended by the Department for Libraries and Archives; and

For any appointments the county judge/executive decides not to fill from the first recommendations, shall request the Department for Libraries and Archives to submit within thirty (30) days two (2) additional recommended persons for each unfilled appointment, and, with the approval of the fiscal court, may make the selection from those recommendations; and

For any remaining unfilled appointments after the provisions of subparagraph 1. of this paragraph have been followed, shall appoint, with the approval of the fiscal court, individuals of his or her choosing, whether or not the individuals signed the petition, no later than thirty (30) days after the day the county judge/executive received the recommendations under subparagraph 1.b. of this paragraph and made no appointment therefrom. The county judge/executive shall notify the Department for Libraries and Archives of the name of any individual appointed in the manner set out in this subparagraph; and

The terms of the members of the counties composing the previously existing district shall expire immediately upon the organization of the new board and such vacancies shall be filled as provided in KRS

173.490

.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 114, § 4, effective June 16, 1960; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 20, § 6, effective January 2, 1978; 1980, ch. 18, § 15, effective July 15, 1980; 1980, ch. 188, § 130, effective July 15, 1980; 1984, ch. 218, § 1, effective July 13, 1984; 1990, ch. 58, § 3, effective July 13, 1990; 2022 ch. 221, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

173.490.
Terms of board members — Appointment to fill vacancies — Removal of members — Advisory board. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

One-third (1/3) of the persons first appointed to the board shall serve for a term of two (2) years, one-third (1/3) for a term of three (3) years and one-third (1/3) for a term of four (4) years. Where the board consists of a number of members not divisible by three (3), one-third (1/3) of the next higher number divisible by three (3), shall serve for a term of two (2) years, one-third (1/3) for a term of three (3) years and the remaining number shall serve for a term of four (4) years. Thereafter, as their terms expire, their successors shall be recommended by the board. The board shall recommend two (2) persons committed to the provision of library services to the Department for Libraries and Archives, for each vacancy. The names shall be forwarded to the Department for Libraries and Archives and the state librarian and commissioner shall recommend those names to the county judge/executive. The county judge/executive shall immediately, with the approval of the fiscal court, make his selection from those recommended. Board members thus appointed shall serve a term of four (4) years each. Trustees may serve for two (2) consecutive terms after which they shall not succeed themselves. They may be reappointed no earlier than twelve (12) months following the end of their last service. The members shall hold office until their respective successors are appointed and qualified. After absence of a trustee from four (4) regular monthly meetings of the board during any one (1) year of the trustee’s term, the trustee shall be considered to have automatically resigned from the board. An advisory board may be appointed and serve as specified in the bylaws of the board of trustees.

Any vacancy occurring in the terms of office of members shall be filled for the unexpired term by the county judge/executive, with the approval of the fiscal court, by appointment on recommendation of the state librarian and commissioner of two (2) names of persons committed to the provision of library services and living in the county in which the vacancy occurred.

A member of the board may be removed from office as provided by KRS

65.007

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 114, § 5; 1974, ch. 8, § 6; 1974, ch. 74, Art. VIII, B, § 1; 1980, ch. 18, § 16, effective July 15, 1980; 1982, ch. 245, § 10, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 218, § 2, effective July 13, 1984; 1990, ch. 58, § 18, effective July 13, 1990.

Opinions of Attorney General.

There is no statute authorizing the fiscal court or the county judge (now county judge/executive) to remove a library trustee under any circumstances.

OAG 76-757

.

173.490.
Terms of board members — Appointment to fill vacancies — Removal of members — Advisory board. [Effective January 1, 2023]

One-third (1/3) of the persons first appointed to the board shall serve for a term of two (2) years, one-third (1/3) for a term of three (3) years and one-third (1/3) for a term of four (4) years. Where the board consists of a number of members not divisible by three (3), one-third (1/3) of the next higher number divisible by three (3), shall serve for a term of two (2) years, one-third (1/3) for a term of three (3) years, and the remaining number shall serve for a term of four (4) years. Thereafter, as their terms expire, the board shall make recommendations on their successors, who shall be appointed as set out in paragraph (b) of this subsection.

The board shall recommend two (2) persons committed to the provision of library services to the Department for Libraries and Archives for each vacancy. The names shall be forwarded to the Department for Libraries and Archives and the state librarian and commissioner shall recommend those names to the county judge/executive. The county judge/executive shall immediately, with the approval of the fiscal court, make the selection from those recommended unless the fiscal court has adopted an alternative appointment process through the passage of a resolution. For fiscal courts that adopt an alternative appointment process, the county judge/executive:

May immediately, with the approval of the fiscal court, make the selection from those recommended by the state librarian and commissioner; and

For any appointments the county judge/executive decides not to fill from the first recommendations, shall request the Department for Libraries and Archives to submit within thirty (30) days two (2) additional recommended persons for each unfilled appointment, and, with the approval of the fiscal court, may make the selection from those recommendations; and

For any remaining unfilled appointments after the provisions of subparagraph 1. of this paragraph have been followed, shall appoint, with the approval of the fiscal court, individuals of his or her choosing no later than thirty (30) days after the day the county judge/executive received the recommendations under subparagraph 1.b. of this paragraph and made no appointment therefrom. The county judge/executive shall notify the Department for Libraries and Archives of the name of any individual appointed in the manner set out in this subparagraph.

Board members thus appointed shall serve a term of four (4) years each. Trustees may serve for two (2) consecutive terms after which they shall not succeed themselves. They may be reappointed no earlier than twelve (12) months following the end of their last service. The members shall hold office until their respective successors are appointed and qualified. After absence of a trustee from four (4) regular monthly meetings of the board during any one (1) year of the trustee’s term, the trustee shall be considered to have automatically resigned from the board. An advisory board may be appointed and serve as specified in the bylaws of the board of trustees.

Any vacancy occurring in the terms of office of members shall be filled for the unexpired term by the county judge/executive, with the approval of the fiscal court, by appointment on recommendation of the state librarian and commissioner of two (2) names of persons committed to the provision of library services and living in the county in which the vacancy occurred unless the fiscal court has adopted an alternative appointment process through the passage of a resolution. For fiscal courts that adopt an alternative appointment process, the county judge/executive:

May immediately, with the approval of the fiscal court, make the appointment on the recommendation of the state librarian and commissioner of two (2) names of persons committed to the provision of library services and living in the county in which the vacancy occurred; and

If the county judge/executive decides not to make the appointment from the first recommendations, shall request the Department for Libraries and Archives to submit within thirty (30) days two (2) additional recommended persons for the unfilled appointment, and, with the approval of the fiscal court, may make the selection from those recommendations; and

For any remaining unfilled appointment after the provisions of paragraph (a) of this subsection have been followed, shall appoint, with the approval of the fiscal court, an individual of his or her choosing no later than thirty (30) days after the day the county judge/executive received the recommendations under paragraph (a)2. of this subsection and made no appointment therefrom. Any person appointed in accordance with this paragraph shall be committed to the provision of library services and living in the county in which the vacancy occurred. The county judge/executive shall notify the Department for Libraries and Archives of the name of any individual appointed in the manner set out in this paragraph.

A member of the board may be removed from office as provided by KRS

65.007

.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 114, § 5; 1974, ch. 8, § 6; 1974, ch. 74, Art. VIII, B, § 1; 1980, ch. 18, § 16, effective July 15, 1980; 1982, ch. 245, § 10, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 218, § 2, effective July 13, 1984; 1990, ch. 58, § 18, effective July 13, 1990; 2022 ch. 221, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

173.500.
Board constitutes body corporate — Name — Officers — Meetings — Quorum.

Each board shall be a body corporate under the name and style of “.... Public Library District Board of Trustees.” The members shall, as soon as possible after their appointment, organize by electing a president, a secretary, a treasurer, and other officers as deemed necessary, each to serve for a term of two (2) years and until a successor is elected and qualified. The board shall meet on a regularly scheduled basis once each month. A majority of the board shall constitute a quorum.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 114, § 6; 1974, ch. 8, § 7; 1990, ch. 58, § 4, effective July 13, 1990.

173.510.
Expenses — Employment of relatives — Conflict of interest.

The members of the board shall not receive compensation for their services, but may be reimbursed for their actual expenses necessarily incurred in the performance of their duties, upon vouchers duly approved by the board, signed by the secretary and countersigned by the president. No board shall newly employ as a member of its library staff any member of the board or any person related closer than a second cousin to any member of the board. No person is eligible to this office who is directly or indirectly interested in the sale to the library of books, magazines, supplies, equipment, materials, insurance, or services for which library funds are expended.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 114, § 7; 1982, ch. 245, § 14, effective July 15, 1982; 1990, ch. 58, § 5, effective July 13, 1990.

173.520.
Duties, powers of board — Approval by department. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

The board shall establish, equip and maintain libraries or contract with existing libraries for the furnishing of library service for the district and do all things necessary to provide efficient library service. The board may also enter an agreement pursuant to KRS

65.210

to

65.300

for the provision of additional library service. No district shall establish a library unless the plans for the establishment, equipment, and maintenance have been approved by the Department for Libraries and Archives. No contract shall be made unless the libraries contracting to furnish service are libraries approved by the Department for Libraries and Archives for this purpose.

The district, as a body corporate, by and through the board may:

Sue and be sued, complain and defend, purchase, or lease grounds, purchase, lease, occupy or erect appropriate buildings for the use of the district libraries and their branches, sell and convey real and personal property for and on behalf of the district, receive gifts of real and personal property for the use and benefit of the district, the same when accepted to be held and controlled by the board according to the terms of the deed, gift, devise or bequest of such property;

Borrow money on the credit of the board in anticipation of the revenue to be derived from taxes levied by the district for the fiscal year in which the money is borrowed, and to pledge the taxes levied for the district for the payment of the principal and interest of the loan. The principal shall not exceed fifty percent (50%) of the anticipated revenue for the fiscal year in which the money is borrowed;

Establish bylaws it deems necessary and expedient to define the duties of officers or employees and make all necessary policies governing libraries, library service and personnel within the district.

The board in exercise of its powers shall be guided by the regulations and requirements of the Department for Libraries and Archives.

The powers set forth in this section shall not be construed to limit, restrict or modify any powers or authority granted by any other part of KRS

173.450

to

173.650

or any other law not in conflict with the provisions of this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 114, § 8, effective June 16, 1960; 1970, ch. 241, § 6; 1982, ch. 245, § 12, effective July 15, 1982; 1990, ch. 58, § 6, effective July 13, 1990.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Under subsection (2)(b) of this section the entire principal sum borrowed shall not exceed 50 percent of the anticipated revenue for the fiscal year in which the money is borrowed.

OAG 64-207

.

A county library district could not borrow funds to build a new building to be repaid from tax revenues over a period of 20 years.

OAG 65-261

.

The county judge (now county judge/executive) and the fiscal court have no authority in the determination of whether or not a branch library will be established, for this matter is solely one for the sound judgment of the district board of trustees.

OAG 76-757

.

The board of a library established under KRS

173.450

to

173.650

and

173.710

to

173.800

has the duty to file with the county judge/executive an annual report and such other reports as the fiscal court may require.

OAG 78-331

.

A library district can qualify to issue revenue bonds under KRS Ch. 58, since it is a special taxing district under Const., § 157 and is a “governmental agency”under KRS 58.010(3); if it issues revenue bonds for a proposed project, the library district board can exercise the power to condemn real estate pursuant to KRS

58.140

. However, a library district which planned to use mortgage financing for library improvements had no power to condemn the real estate needed.

OAG 82-343

.

While subsection (1) of this section and KRS 173.745(1) provide that the library district board shall “do all things necessary to provide efficient library service,” that language does not, standing alone, grant the power of condemnation.

OAG 82-343

.

173.520.
Duties, powers of board — Approval by department — Approval of fiscal court, when needed. [Effective January 1, 2023]

The board shall establish, equip, and maintain libraries or contract with existing libraries for the furnishing of library service for the district and do all things necessary to provide efficient library service. The board may also enter an agreement pursuant to KRS

65.210

to

65.300

for the provision of additional library service. No district shall establish a library unless the plans for the establishment, equipment, and maintenance have been approved by the Department for Libraries and Archives. No contract shall be made unless the libraries contracting to furnish service are libraries approved by the Department for Libraries and Archives for this purpose.

The district, as a body corporate, by and through the board may:

Sue and be sued, complain and defend, purchase, or lease grounds, purchase, lease, occupy or erect appropriate buildings for the use of the district libraries and their branches, lease or build to lease appropriate buildings for use by educational institutions, sell and convey real and personal property for and on behalf of the district, receive gifts of real and personal property for the use and benefit of the district, the same when accepted to be held and controlled by the board according to the terms of the deed, gift, devise or bequest of such property;

Borrow money on the credit of the board in anticipation of the revenue to be derived from taxes levied by the district for the fiscal year in which the money is borrowed, and to pledge the taxes levied for the district for the payment of the principal and interest of the loan. The principal shall not exceed fifty percent (50%) of the anticipated revenue for the fiscal year in which the money is borrowed;

Establish bylaws it deems necessary and expedient to define the duties of officers or employees and make all necessary policies governing libraries, library service and personnel within the district.

The following requires the majority vote of the board members and approval of the fiscal court:

Leasing appropriate buildings for use by educational institutions;

Constructing appropriate buildings for use by educational institutions; and

The approval of expenditures for capital projects with a total cost that is equal to or greater than one million dollars ($1,000,000). This subparagraph does not apply to awards made from the public library facilities construction fund under KRS

171.027

that were made before January 1, 2023.

Buildings for use by educational institutions shall be deemed appropriate buildings for purposes of this subsection and subsection (2) of this section when the building meets the school building requirements established by the Kentucky Board of Education.

The board in exercise of its powers shall be guided by the regulations and requirements of the Department for Libraries and Archives.

The powers set forth in this section shall not be construed to limit, restrict or modify any powers or authority granted by any other part of KRS

173.450

to

173.650

or any other law not in conflict with the provisions of this section.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 114, § 8, effective June 16, 1960; 1970, ch. 241, § 6; 1982, ch. 245, § 12, effective July 15, 1982; 1990, ch. 58, § 6, effective July 13, 1990; 2022 ch. 221, § 3, effective January 1, 2023.

173.530.
Library director and staff.

The board shall employ a library director and upon that person’s recommendation may employ other staff as it deems necessary. The library director and staff shall be certified in accordance with the provisions of KRS

171.240

to

171.300

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 114, § 9, effective June 16, 1960; 1990, ch. 58, § 7, effective July 13, 1990.

173.540.
Duties of treasurer of board — Bond.

The treasurer of the board shall:

Have the custody of all money, securities, and obligations belonging to that district, and shall disburse money only for the uses and purposes of the district and in the manner prescribed by the bylaws on itemized vouchers allowed by the board, signed by the secretary and countersigned by the president;

Keep a full and accurate account of all receipts and payments in the manner directed by the bylaws, and such other accounts as the board prescribes;

Render statements of accounts of the several books, funds, and property of the library whenever required by the board;

Have all accounts and records for the fiscal year fully made up and present the same to the board within ninety (90) days following the close of that fiscal year;

Give bond to the Commonwealth for the faithful performance of those duties, in the sum and form and with the sureties approved by the board.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 114, § 10, effective June 16, 1960; 1990, ch. 58, § 8, effective July 13, 1990.

173.550.
Records to be kept open.

Every district established under KRS

173.450

to

173.650

shall at all reasonable times keep open for the inspection of the Auditor of Public Accounts all of its records and books of accounts.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 114, § 11, effective June 16, 1960.

173.560.
Fiscal year.

The fiscal year of a district shall commence July 1st and close on June 30th.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 114, § 12, effective June 16, 1960.

173.570.
Report required — Contents — Compliance with KRS 65A.010 to 65A.090.

Within sixty (60) days after the close of each fiscal year the board shall make a written report to the Department for Libraries and Archives. A copy of this report shall be filed with the county clerk of each county within the district. The report shall contain:

A statement of the property acquired by devise, bequest, purchase, gift or otherwise during the fiscal year;

A statement of the character of library service furnished to the district during the fiscal year; and

Any other statistics or information requested by the Department for Libraries and Archives.

The board shall comply with the provisions of KRS

65A.010

to

65A.090

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 114, § 13, effective June 16, 1960; 2013, ch. 40, § 60, effective March 21, 2013.

173.580.
Attorney — Compensation.

The board may, in its discretion, employ or retain a regularly licensed attorney to advise them on all matters pertaining to their duties and shall have the discretion to delegate such authority to said attorney not forbidden by law.

The board may fix the salary or compensation of the attorney provided for in subsection (1) of this section, in its discretion.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 114, § 14, effective June 16, 1960; 1990, ch. 58, § 9, effective July 13, 1990.

173.590.
Workshop attendance. [Repealed.]

173.600.
Revenue bonds.

Public library districts may, in addition to all other methods provided by law, acquire, construct, and improve library facilities through the issuance of revenue bonds under the terms and provisions of KRS

58.010

to

58.140

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 114, § 16, effective June 16, 1960.

173.610.
Tax rate change prohibited except by vote of people — Procedure — Limitation.

The special ad valorem tax rate for the maintenance and operation of a public library district created pursuant to KRS

173.470

before July 13, 1984, may be increased or decreased by submission to the voters of the district at a general election and approved by a majority of the votes cast on the issue. The board or any one hundred (100) qualified voters residing within the district may file a duly certified copy of a resolution or petition with the clerk of each county within the district and the county clerk shall certify whether the petition is sufficient not later than the second Tuesday in August prior to the election and the clerk shall thereupon cause the question to be prepared to be presented to the voters in substantially the following form:

Any increase provided for in subsection (1) or (3) of this section shall not exceed twenty cents ($0.20) on each one hundred dollars ($100) of the assessed valuation of all property in the district.

The special ad valorem tax rate for the maintenance and operation of a public library district created pursuant to KRS

173.470

before July 13, 1984, may be increased or decreased by the procedure in KRS

173.790

.

“Are you in favor of increasing (or decreasing) from (insert amount) cents to (insert amount) cents on each one hundred dollars ($100) of the assessed valuation of all property in the (insert name of public library district) public library district the maximum tax which the district can impose for the maintenance and operation of (insert name of district) public library district?”

Click to view

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 114, § 17; 1972, ch. 223, § 8; 1982, ch. 360, § 53, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 100, § 13, effective July 13, 1984; 1996, ch. 195, § 63, effective July 15, 1996.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

Although this section was included in Acts 1982, Ch. 245, § 16, the change in this section was deleted in the House Committee Substitute adopted by the General Assembly.

Opinions of Attorney General.

The increase or decrease in the tax rate must follow the identical method employed in the creation of such library district.

OAG 67-263

.

Where after the rollback a library district did not have sufficient funds to operate, under this section a petition could be filed putting the question of an increased tax levy to a vote of the people, and if the vote was affirmative the tax could be raised to exceed the rollback rate.

OAG 68-606

.

There is no limitation to the number of times a tax question can be submitted to the voters.

OAG 72-571

.

Since the requirement of KRS 173.790(3)(c) applies only to library districts created by petition, and this section contains no such restrictions, there is no need for a ballot created district to wait three years before seeking reduction of the supporting ad valorem tax.

OAG 79-102

.

The compensating tax rate would be computed on the rate passed by the voters of a county library district, whatever that rate may be for the previous year.

OAG 79-597

.

Where a petition seeking an increase in the special ad valorem tax rate is filed with the county clerk, the county clerk must make a reasonable comparison of the signatures on the petition sufficient to satisfy himself that the petitioners are in fact qualified and registered voters of the district.

OAG 84-141

.

173.620.
Annexation — Procedure.

Counties outside of any existing district, and contiguous thereto, may be annexed to the district in the following manner:

Upon filing with the fiscal court of a duly certified petition of one hundred (100) or more qualified voters residing within each county proposed to be annexed, the fiscal court of each county in the district and each county proposed to be annexed shall adopt a resolution submitting to the qualified voters of the county the question as to whether the territory should be annexed. A certified copy of the order of the fiscal court shall be filed with the county clerk not later than the second Tuesday in August prior to the next general election and thereupon the county clerk shall cause the question to be placed before the voters.

The question shall be in substantially the following form:

If the majority of those voting in each county on the question favor the annexation of the territory it shall be so annexed.

“Are you in favor of annexing the following described territory (here describe the territory) to the (name district) Public Library District?”

Click to view

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 114, § 18, effective June 16, 1960; 1982, ch. 360, § 54, effective July 15, 1982; 1996, ch. 195, § 64, effective July 15, 1996.

173.630.
Dissolution — Procedure.

A library district established pursuant to KRS

173.470

which has been in existence for at least three (3) years may be dissolved in the following manner:

Upon filing of a duly-certified petition of ten percent (10%) or more of the qualified voters in the district or one hundred (100) or more qualified voters in the district, whichever is more, the fiscal court of each county in the district shall adopt a resolution submitting to the qualified voters of the district the question as to whether the district shall be dissolved. A certified copy of the order of each fiscal court shall be filed with the county clerk not later than the second Tuesday in August prior to the next regular election and thereupon the clerk shall cause the question to be placed before the voters;

The question shall be in substantially the following form:

If a majority of those voting on the question within the district favor the dissolution such district shall thereupon be dissolved.

“Are you in favor of dissolving the (insert name of district) Public Library District?”; and

Click to view

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 114, § 19, effective June 16, 1960; 1978, ch. 384, § 297, effective June 17, 1978; 1982, ch. 245, § 17, effective July 15, 1982; 1982, ch. 360, § 55, effective July 15, 1982; 1996, ch. 195, § 65, effective July 15, 1996.

Opinions of Attorney General.

A library district created by the petition method can only be dissolved by the petition method, and a library district created by a vote of the people can only be dissolved by a vote of the people.

OAG 67-263

.

173.640.
Conduct of elections.

All elections authorized by KRS

173.450

to

173.650

shall be held and conducted in all respects under the general election laws obtaining in this Commonwealth at the time of the election.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 114, § 20, effective June 16, 1960.

173.650.
Certification of election results.

The results of the election in each county shall be certified by the county election commissioners to the county judge/executive in each county. When more than one (1) county is involved the county judges/executive shall certify the results in their respective counties to the county judge/executive of the county having the largest voting population.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 114, § 21, effective June 16, 1960; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 20, § 6, effective January 2, 1978.